District of Columbia statutes.
31-5041.12

Applicability; construction.

(a)

This chapter shall:

(1)

Apply to all persons engaged in the business of title insurance in the District;

(2)

Supplement the provisions of Chapter 11A of this title [§ 31-1131.01 et seq.].

(b)

This chapter shall not:

(1)

Except as otherwise provided, limit the application of any insurance law codified in this title; or

(2)

Limit or restrict the rights of policyholders, claimants, and creditors.

(c)

If there is a conflict between a provision of this chapter and any other act relating to insurance which is codified in this title, including Chapter 11A of this title [§ 31-1131.01 et seq.], this chapter shall apply.

(d)

This chapter shall apply as of January 1, 2011, and to all transactions entered into after January 1, 2011.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2133, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2133 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).